Florida, session 2026, SB276.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âSection 193.155, Florida Statutes, is amended to 29 read: 30 193.155âHomestead assessments.âHomestead property shall be 31 assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving 32 the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed 33 at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property 34 receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8) 35 or subsection (9) apply. 36 (1)âBeginning in 1995, or the year following the year the 37 property receives homestead exemption, whichever is later, the 38 property shall be reassessed annually on January 1. Any change 39 resulting from such reassessment shall not exceed the lower of 40 the following: 41 (a)âThree percent of the assessed value of the property for 42 the prior year; or 43 (b)âThe percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for 44 All Urban Consumers, U.S. City Average, all items 1967=100, or 45 successor reports for the preceding calendar year as initially 46 reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of 47 Labor Statistics. 48 (2)âIf the assessed value of the property as calculated 49 under subsection (1) exceeds the just value, the assessed value 50 of the property shall be lowered to the just value of the 51 property. 52 (3)(a)âExcept as provided in this subsection, or subsection 53 (8), or subsection (9), property assessed under this section 54 shall be assessed at just value as of January 1 of the year 55 following a change of ownership. Thereafter, the annual changes 56 in the assessed value of the property are subject to the 57 limitations in subsections (1) and (2). For the purpose of this 58 section, a change of ownership means any sale, foreclosure, or 59 transfer of legal title or beneficial title in equity to any 60 person, except if any of the following apply: 61 1.âSubsequent to the change or transfer, the same person is 62 entitled to the homestead exemption as was previously entitled 63 and: 64 a.âThe transfer of title is to correct an error; 65 b.âThe transfer is between legal and equitable title or 66 equitable and equitable title and no additional person applies 67 for a homestead exemption on the property; 68 c.âThe change or transfer is by means of an instrument in 69 which the owner is listed as both grantor and grantee of the 70 real property and one or more other individuals are additionally 71 named as grantee. However, if any individual who is additionally 72 named as a grantee applies for a homestead exemption on the 73 property, the application is considered a change of ownership; 74 d.âThe change or transfer is by means of an instrument in 75 which the owner entitled to the homestead exemption is listed as 76 both grantor and grantee of the real property and one or more 77 other individuals, all of whom held title as joint tenants with 78 rights of survivorship with the owner, are named only as 79 grantors and are removed from the title; or 80 e.âThe person is a lessee entitled to the homestead 81 exemption under s. 196.041(1); 82 2.âLegal or equitable title is changed or transferred 83 between husband and wife, including a change or transfer to a 84 surviving spouse or a transfer due to a dissolution of marriage; 85 3.âThe transfer occurs by operation of law to the surviving 86 spouse or minor child or children under s. 732.401; 87 4.âUpon the death of the owner, the transfer is between the 88 owner and another who is a permanent resident and who is legally 89 or naturally dependent upon the owner; or 90 5.âThe transfer occurs with respect to a property where all 91 of the following apply: 92 a.âMultiple owners hold title as joint tenants with rights 93 of survivorship; 94 b.âOne or more owners were entitled to and received the 95 homestead exemption on the property; 96 c.âThe death of one or more owners occurs; and 97 d.âSubsequent to the transfer, the surviving owner or 98 owners previously entitled to and receiving the homestead 99 exemption continue to be entitled to and receive the homestead 100 exemption. 101 (b)âFor purposes of this subsection, a leasehold interest 102 that qualifies for the homestead exemption under s. 196.031 or 103 s. 196.041 shall be treated as an equitable interest in the 104 property. 105 (4)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b) and s. 193.624, 106 changes, additions, or improvements to homestead property shall 107 be assessed at just value as of the first January 1 after the 108 changes, additions, or improvements are substantially completed. 109 (b)1.âChanges, additions, or improvements that replace all 110 or a portion of homestead property, including ancillary 111 improvements, damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity 112 shall be assessed upon substantial completion as provided in 113 this paragraph. Such assessment must be calculated using the 114 homestead propertyâs assessed value as of the January 1 115 immediately before the date on which the damage or destruction 116 was sustained, subject to the assessment limitations in 117 subsections (1) and (2), when: 118 a.âThe square footage of the homestead property as changed 119 or improved does not exceed 130 percent of the square footage of 120 the homestead property before the damage or destruction; or 121 b.âThe total square footage of the homestead property as 122 changed or improved does not exceed 2,000 square feet. 123 2.âThe homestead propertyâs assessed value must be 124 increased by the just value of that portion of the changed or 125 improved homestead property which is in excess of 130 percent of 126 the square footage of the homestead property before the damage 127 or destruction or of that portion exceeding 2,000 square feet. 128 3.âHomestead property damaged or destroyed by misfortune or 129 calamity which, after being changed or improved, has a square 130 footage of less than 100 percent of the homestead propertyâs 131 total square footage before the damage or destruction shall be 132 assessed pursuant to subsection (5). 133 4.âChanges, additions, or improvements assessed pursuant to 134 this paragraph must be reassessed pursuant to subsection (1) in 135 subsequent years. This paragraph applies to changes, additions, 136 or improvements commenced within 5 years after the January 1 137 following the damage or destruction of the homestead. 138 (c)âChanges, additions, or improvements that replace all or 139 a portion of real property that was damaged or destroyed by 140 misfortune or calamity shall be assessed upon substantial 141 completion as if such damage or destruction had not occurred and 142 in accordance with paragraph (b) if the owner of such property: 143 1.âWas permanently residing on such property when the 144 damage or destruction occurred; 145 2.âWas not entitled to receive homestead exemption on such 146 property as of January 1 of that year; and 147 3.âApplies for and receives homestead exemption on such 148 property the following year. 149 (d)âChanges, additions, or improvements include 150 improvements made to common areas or other improvements made to 151 property other than to the homestead property by the owner or by 152 an owner association, which improvements directly benefit the 153 homestead property. Such changes, additions, or improvements 154 shall be assessed at just value, and the just value shall be 155 apportioned among the parcels benefiting from the improvement. 156 (5)âWhen property is destroyed or removed and not replaced, 157 the assessed value of the parcel shall be reduced by the 158 assessed value attributable to the destroyed or removed 159 property. 160 (6)âOnly property that receives a homestead exemption is 161 subject to this section. No portion of property that is assessed 162 solely on the basis of character or use pursuant to s. 193.461 163 or s. 193.501, or assessed pursuant to s. 193.505, is subject to 164 this section. When property is assessed under s. 193.461, s. 165 193.501, or s. 193.505 and contains a residence under the same 166 ownership, the portion of the property consisting of the 167 residence and curtilage must be assessed separately, pursuant to 168 s. 193.011, for the assessment to be subject to the limitation 169 in this section. 170 (7)âIf a person received a homestead exemption limited to 171 that personâs proportionate interest in real property, the 172 provisions of this section apply only to that interest. 173 (8)âProperty assessed under this section shall be assessed 174 at less than just value when the person who establishes a new 175 homestead has received a homestead exemption as of January 1 of 176 any of the 3 immediately preceding years. For purposes of this 177 subsection, a husband and wife who owned and both permanently 178 resided on a previous homestead shall each be considered to have 179 received the homestead exemption even though only the husband or 180 the wife applied for the homestead exemption on the previous 181 homestead. The assessed value of the newly established homestead 182 shall be determined as provided in this subsection. 183 (a)âIf the just value of the new homestead as of January 1 184 is greater than or equal to the just value of the immediate 185 prior homestead as of January 1 of the year in which the 186 immediate prior homestead was abandoned, the assessed value of 187 the new homestead shall be the just value of the new homestead 188 minus an amount equal to the lesser of $500,000 or the 189 difference between the just value and the assessed value of the 190 immediate prior homestead as of January 1 of the year in which 191 the prior homestead was abandoned. Thereafter, the homestead 192 shall be assessed as provided in this section. 193 (b)âIf the just value of the new homestead as of January 1 194 is less than the just value of the immediate prior homestead as 195 of January 1 of the year in which the immediate prior homestead 196 was abandoned, the assessed value of the new homestead shall be 197 equal to the just value of the new homestead divided by the just 198 value of the immediate prior homestead and multiplied by the 199 assessed value of the immediate prior homestead. However, if the 200 difference between the just value of the new homestead and the 201 assessed value of the new homestead calculated pursuant to this 202 paragraph is greater than $500,000, the assessed value of the 203 new homestead shall be increased so that the difference between 204 the just value and the assessed value equals $500,000. 205 Thereafter, the homestead shall be assessed as provided in this 206 section. 207 (c)âIf two or more persons who have each received a 208 homestead exemption as of January 1 of any of the 3 immediately 209 preceding years and who would otherwise be eligible to have a 210 new homestead property assessed under this subsection establish 211 a single new homestead, the reduction from just value is limited 212 to the higher of the difference between the just value and the 213 assessed value of either of the prior eligible homesteads as of 214 January 1 of the year in which either of the eligible prior 215 homesteads was abandoned, but may not exceed $500,000. 216 (d)âIf two or more persons abandon jointly owned and 217 jointly titled property that received a homestead exemption as 218 of January 1 of any of the 3 immediately preceding years, and 219 one or more such persons who were entitled to and received a 220 homestead exemption on the abandoned property establish a new 221 homestead that would otherwise be eligible for assessment under 222 this subsection, each such person establishing a new homestead 223 is entitled to a reduction from just value for the new homestead 224 equal to the just value of the prior homestead minus the 225 assessed value of the prior homestead divided by the number of 226 owners of the prior homestead who received a homestead 227 exemption, unless the title of the property contains specific 228 ownership shares, in which case the share of reduction from just 229 value shall be proportionate to the ownership share. In the case 230 of a husband and wife abandoning jointly titled property, the 231 husband and wife may designate the ownership share to be 232 attributed to each spouse by following the procedure in 233 paragraph (f). To qualify to make such a designation, the 234 husband and wife must be married on the date that the jointly 235 owned property is abandoned. In calculating the assessment 236 reduction to be transferred from a prior homestead that has an 237 assessment reduction for living quarters of parents or 238 grandparents pursuant to s. 193.703, the value calculated 239 pursuant to s. 193.703(6) must first be added back to the 240 assessed value of the prior homestead. The total reduction from 241 just value for all new homesteads established under this 242 paragraph may not exceed $500,000. There shall be no reduction 243 from just value of any new homestead unless the prior homestead 244 is reassessed at just value or is reassessed under this 245 subsection as of January 1 after the abandonment occurs. 246 (e)âIf one or more persons who previously owned a single 247 homestead and each received the homestead exemption qualify for 248 a new homestead where all persons who qualify for homestead 249 exemption in the new homestead also qualified for homestead 250 exemption in the previous homestead without an additional person 251 qualifying for homestead exemption in the new homestead, the 252 reduction in just value shall be calculated pursuant to 253 paragraph (a) or paragraph (b), without application of paragraph 254 (c) or paragraph (d). 255 (f)âA husband and wife abandoning jointly titled property 256 who wish to designate the ownership share to be attributed to 257 each person for purposes of paragraph (d) must file a form 258 provided by the department with the property appraiser in the 259 county where such property is located. The form must include a 260 sworn statement by each person designating the ownership share 261 to be attributed to each person for purposes of paragraph (d) 262 and must be filed prior to either person filing the form 263 required under paragraph (h) to have a parcel of property 264 assessed under this subsection. Such a designation, once filed 265 with the property appraiser, is irrevocable. 266 (g)âFor purposes of receiving an assessment reduction 267 pursuant to this subsection, a person entitled to assessment 268 under this section may abandon his or her homestead even though 269 it remains his or her primary residence by notifying the 270 property appraiser of the county where the homestead is located. 271 This notification must be in writing and delivered at the same 272 time as or before timely filing a new application for homestead 273 exemption on the property. 274 (h)âIn order to have his or her homestead property assessed 275 under this subsection, a person must file a form provided by the 276 department as an attachment to the application for homestead 277 exemption, including a copy of the form required to be filed 278 under paragraph (f), if applicable. The form, which must include 279 a sworn statement attesting to the applicantâs entitlement to 280 assessment under this subsection, shall be considered sufficient 281 documentation for applying for assessment under this subsection. 282 The department shall require by rule that the required form be 283 submitted with the application for homestead exemption under the 284 timeframes and processes set forth in chapter 196 to the extent 285 practicable. 286 (i)1.âIf the previous homestead was located in a different 287 county than the new homestead, the property appraiser in the 288 county where the new homestead is located must transmit a copy 289 of the completed form together with a completed application for 290 homestead exemption to the property appraiser in the county 291 where the previous homestead was located. If the previous 292 homesteads of applicants for transfer were in more than one 293 county, each applicant from a different county must submit a 294 separate form. 295 2.âThe property appraiser in the county where the previous 296 homestead was located must return information to the property 297 appraiser in the county where the new homestead is located by 298 April 1 or within 2 weeks after receipt of the completed 299 application from that property appraiser, whichever is later. As 300 part of the information returned, the property appraiser in the 301 county where the previous homestead was located must provide 302 sufficient information concerning the previous homestead to 303 allow the property appraiser in the county where the new 304 homestead is located to calculate the amount of the assessment 305 limitation difference which may be transferred and must certify 306 whether the previous homestead was abandoned and has been or 307 will be reassessed at just value or reassessed according to the 308 provisions of this subsection as of the January 1 following its 309 abandonment. 310 3.âBased on the information provided on the form from the 311 property appraiser in the county where the previous homestead 312 was located, the property appraiser in the county where the new 313 homestead is located shall calculate the amount of the 314 assessment limitation difference which may be transferred and 315 apply the difference to the January 1 assessment of the new 316 homestead. 317 4.âAll property appraisers having information-sharing 318 agreements with the department are authorized to share 319 confidential tax information with each other pursuant to s. 320 195.084, including social security numbers and linked 321 information on the forms provided pursuant to this section. 322 5.âThe transfer of any limitation is not final until any 323 values on the assessment roll on which the transfer is based are 324 final. If such values are final after tax notice bills have been 325 sent, the property appraiser shall make appropriate corrections 326 and a corrected tax notice bill shall be sent. Any values that 327 are under administrative or judicial review shall be noticed to 328 the tribunal or court for accelerated hearing and resolution so 329 that the intent of this subsection may be carried out. 330 6.âIf the property appraiser in the county where the 331 previous homestead was located has not provided information 332 sufficient to identify the previous homestead and the assessment 333 limitation difference is transferable, the taxpayer may file an 334 action in circuit court in that county seeking to establish that 335 the property appraiser must provide such information. 336 7.âIf the information from the property appraiser in the 337 county where the previous homestead was located is provided 338 after the procedures in this section are exercised, the property 339 appraiser in the county where the new homestead is located shall 340 make appropriate corrections and a corrected tax notice and tax 341 bill shall be sent. 342 8.âThis subsection does not authorize the consideration or 343 adjustment of the just, assessed, or taxable value of the 344 previous homestead property. 345 9.âThe property appraiser in the county where the new 346 homestead is located shall promptly notify a taxpayer if the 347 information received, or available, is insufficient to identify 348 the previous homestead and the amount of the assessment 349 limitation difference which is transferable. Such notification 350 shall be sent on or before July 1 as specified in s. 196.151. 351 10.âThe taxpayer may correspond with the property appraiser 352 in the county where the previous homestead was located to 353 further seek to identify the homestead and the amount of the 354 assessment limitation difference which is transferable. 355 11.âIf the property appraiser in the county where the 356 previous homestead was located supplies sufficient information 357 to the property appraiser in the county where the new homestead 358 is located, such information shall be considered timely if 359 provided in time for inclusion on the notice of proposed 360 property taxes sent pursuant to ss. 194.011 and 200.065(1). 361 12.âIf the property appraiser has not received information 362 sufficient to identify the previous homestead and the amount of 363 the assessment limitation difference which is transferable 364 before mailing the notice of proposed property taxes, the 365 taxpayer may file a petition with the value adjustment board in 366 the county where the new homestead is located. 367 (j)âAny person who is qualified to have his or her property 368 assessed under this subsection and who fails to file an 369 application by March 1 may file an application for assessment 370 under this subsection and may, pursuant to s. 194.011(3), file a 371 petition with the value adjustment board requesting that an 372 assessment under this subsection be granted. Such petition may 373 be filed at any time during the taxable year on or before the 374 25th day following the mailing of the notice by the property 375 appraiser as provided in s. 194.011(1). Notwithstanding s. 376 194.013, such person must pay a nonrefundable fee of $15 upon 377 filing the petition. Upon reviewing the petition, if the person 378 is qualified to receive the assessment under this subsection and 379 demonstrates particular extenuating circumstances judged by the 380 property appraiser or the value adjustment board to warrant 381 granting the assessment, the property appraiser or the value 382 adjustment board may grant an assessment under this subsection. 383 (k)âAny person who is qualified to have his or her property 384 assessed under this subsection and who fails to timely file an 385 application for his or her new homestead in the first year 386 following eligibility may file in a subsequent year. The 387 assessment reduction shall be applied to assessed value in the 388 year the transfer is first approved, and refunds of tax may not 389 be made for previous years. 390 (l)âThe property appraisers of the state shall, as soon as 391 practicable after March 1 of each year and on or before July 1 392 of that year, carefully consider all applications for assessment 393 under this subsection which have been filed in their respective 394 offices on or before March 1 of that year. If, upon 395 investigation, the property appraiser finds that the applicant 396 is entitled to assessment under this subsection, the property 397 appraiser shall make such entries upon the tax rolls of the 398 county as are necessary to allow the assessment. If, after due 399 consideration, the property appraiser finds that the applicant 400 is not entitled to the assessment under this subsection, the 401 property appraiser shall immediately prepare a notice of such 402 disapproval, giving his or her reasons therefor, and a copy of 403 the notice must be served upon the applicant by the property 404 appraiser by personal delivery or by registered mail to the post 405 office address given by the applicant. The applicant may appeal 406 the decision of the property appraiser refusing to allow the 407 assessment under this subsection to the value adjustment board, 408 and the board shall review the application and evidence 409 presented to the property appraiser upon which the applicant 410 based the claim and hear the applicant in person or by agent on 411 behalf of his or her right to such assessment. Such appeal shall 412 be heard by an attorney special magistrate if the value 413 adjustment board uses special magistrates. The value adjustment 414 board shall reverse the decision of the property appraiser in 415 the cause and grant assessment under this subsection to the 416 applicant if, in its judgment, the applicant is entitled to the 417 assessment or shall affirm the decision of the property 418 appraiser. The action of the board is final in the cause unless 419 the applicant, within 60 days following the date of refusal of 420 the application by the board, files in the circuit court of the 421 county in which the homestead is located a proceeding against 422 the property appraiser for a declaratory judgment as is provided 423 under chapter 86 or other appropriate proceeding. The failure of 424 the taxpayer to appear before the property appraiser or value 425 adjustment board or to file any paper other than the application 426 as provided in this subsection does not constitute a bar to or 427 defense in the proceedings. 428 (m)âFor purposes of receiving an assessment reduction 429 pursuant to this subsection, an owner of a homestead property 430 that was significantly damaged or destroyed as a result of a 431 named tropical storm or hurricane may elect, in the calendar 432 year following the named tropical storm or hurricane, to have 433 the significantly damaged or destroyed homestead deemed to have 434 been abandoned as of the date of the named tropical storm or 435 hurricane even though the owner received a homestead exemption 436 on the property as of January 1 of the year immediately 437 following the named tropical storm or hurricane. The election 438 provided for in this paragraph is available only if the owner 439 establishes a new homestead as of January 1 of the third year 440 immediately following the storm or hurricane. This paragraph 441 shall apply to homestead property damaged or destroyed on or 442 after January 1, 2017. 443 (9)(a)âProperty assessed under this section shall be 444 assessed at less than just value when the owner of the property 445 has used the property as his or her permanent residence for 20 446 years or more. The assessed value of such property shall be the 447 amount established as of January 1 of the 20th year of ownership 448 and residency and may not increase thereafter so long as the 449 property continues to receive the homestead exemption. 450 (b)âPeriods of ownership and residency on multiple 451 homestead properties may be aggregated to meet the 20-year 452 period specified in paragraph (a). The property appraiser shall 453 keep the records necessary to verify eligibility for this 454 assessment limitation, including ownership and residency periods 455 for any previous property for which a homestead exemption was 456 granted. 457 (10)âErroneous assessments of homestead property assessed 458 under this section may be corrected in the following manner: 459 (a)âIf errors are made in arriving at any assessment under 460 this section due to a material mistake of fact concerning an 461 essential characteristic of the property, the just value and 462 assessed value must be recalculated for every such year, 463 including the year in which the mistake occurred. 464 (b)âIf changes, additions, or improvements are not assessed 465 at just value as of the first January 1 after they were 466 substantially completed, the property appraiser shall determine 467 the just value for such changes, additions, or improvements for 468 the year they were substantially completed. Assessments for 469 subsequent years shall be corrected, applying this section if 470 applicable. 471 (c)âIf back taxes are due pursuant to s. 193.092, the 472 corrections made pursuant to this subsection shall be used to 473 calculate such back taxes. 474 (11)(a)(10)(a)âIf the property appraiser determines that 475 for any year or years within the prior 10 years a person who was 476 not entitled to the homestead property assessment limitation 477 granted under this section was granted the homestead property 478 assessment limitation, the property appraiser making such 479 determination shall serve upon the owner a notice of intent to 480 record in the public records of the county a notice of tax lien 481 against any property owned by that person in the county, and 482 such property must be identified in the notice of tax lien. The 483 property appraiser must include with such notice information 484 explaining why the owner is not entitled to the limitation, the 485 years for which unpaid taxes, penalties, and interest are due, 486 and the manner in which unpaid taxes, penalties, and interest 487 have been calculated. Such property that is situated in this 488 state is subject to the unpaid taxes, plus a penalty of 50 489 percent of the unpaid taxes for each year and 15 percent 490 interest per annum. However, when a person entitled to exemption 491 pursuant to s. 196.031 inadvertently receives the limitation 492 pursuant to this section following a change of ownership, the 493 assessment of such property must be corrected as provided in 494 paragraph (10)(a) (9)(a), and the person need not pay the unpaid 495 taxes, penalties, or interest. Before a lien may be filed, the 496 person or entity so notified must be given 30 days to pay the 497 taxes and any applicable penalties and interest. 498 (b)âIf the property appraiser improperly grants the 499 property assessment limitation as a result of a clerical mistake 500 or an omission, the person or entity improperly receiving the 501 property assessment limitation may not be assessed a penalty or 502 interest. Back taxes shall apply only as follows: 503 1.âIf the person who received the limitation as a result of 504 a clerical mistake or omission voluntarily discloses to the 505 property appraiser that he or she was not entitled to the 506 limitation before the property appraiser notifies the owner of 507 the mistake or omission, no back taxes shall be due. 508 2.âIf the person who received the limitation as a result of 509 a clerical mistake or omission does not voluntarily disclose to 510 the property appraiser that he or she was not entitled to the 511 limitation before the property appraiser notifies the owner of 512 the mistake or omission, back taxes shall be due for any year or 513 years that the owner was not entitled to the limitation within 514 the 5 years before the property appraiser notified the owner of 515 the mistake or omission. 516 3.âThe property appraiser shall serve upon an owner that 517 owes back taxes under subparagraph 2. a notice of intent to 518 record in the public records of the county a notice of tax lien 519 against any property owned by that person in the county, and 520 such property must be identified in the notice of tax lien. The 521 property appraiser must include with such notice information 522 explaining why the owner is not entitled to the limitation, the 523 years for which unpaid taxes are due, and the manner in which 524 unpaid taxes have been calculated. Before a lien may be filed, 525 the person or entity so notified must be given 30 days to pay 526 the taxes. 527 Section 2.âSubsections (2) and (6) of section 194.011, 528 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 529 194.011âAssessment notice; objections to assessments.â 530 (2)âAny taxpayer who objects to the assessment placed on 531 any property taxable to him or her, including the assessment of 532 homestead property at less than just value under s. 193.155(8) 533 or (9), may request the property appraiser to informally confer 534 with the taxpayer. Upon receiving the request, the property 535 appraiser, or a member of his or her staff, shall confer with 536 the taxpayer regarding the correctness of the assessment. At 537 this informal conference, the taxpayer shall present those facts 538 considered by the taxpayer to be supportive of the taxpayerâs 539 claim for a change in the assessment of the property appraiser. 540 The property appraiser or his or her representative at this 541 conference shall present those facts considered by the property 542 appraiser to be supportive of the correctness of the assessment. 543 However, nothing herein shall be construed to be a prerequisite 544 to administrative or judicial review of property assessments. 545 (6)âThe following provisions apply to petitions to the 546 value adjustment board concerning the assessment of homestead 547 property at less than just value under s. 193.155(8) or (9): 548 (a)âIf the taxpayer does not agree with the amount of the 549 assessment limitation difference for which the taxpayer 550 qualifies as stated by the property appraiser in the county 551 where the previous homestead property was located, or if the 552 property appraiser in that county has not stated that the 553 taxpayer qualifies to transfer any assessment limitation 554 difference, upon the taxpayer filing a petition to the value 555 adjustment board in the county where the new homestead property 556 is located, the value adjustment board in that county shall, 557 upon receiving the appeal, send a notice to the value adjustment 558 board in the county where the previous homestead was located, 559 which shall reconvene if it has already adjourned. 560 (b)âSuch notice operates as a petition in, and creates an 561 appeal to, the value adjustment board in the county where the 562 previous homestead was located of all issues surrounding the 563 previous assessment differential for the taxpayer involved. 564 However, the taxpayer may not petition to have the just, 565 assessed, or taxable value of the previous homestead changed. 566 (c)âThe value adjustment board in the county where the 567 previous homestead was located shall set the petition for 568 hearing and notify the taxpayer, the property appraiser in the 569 county where the previous homestead was located, the property 570 appraiser in the county where the new homestead is located, and 571 the value adjustment board in that county, and shall hear the 572 appeal. Such appeal shall be heard by an attorney special 573 magistrate if the value adjustment board in the county where the 574 previous homestead was located uses special magistrates. The 575 taxpayer may attend such hearing and present evidence, but need 576 not do so. The value adjustment board in the county where the 577 previous homestead was located shall issue a decision and send a 578 copy of the decision to the value adjustment board in the county 579 where the new homestead is located. 580 (d)âIn hearing the appeal in the county where the new 581 homestead is located, that value adjustment board shall consider 582 the decision of the value adjustment board in the county where 583 the previous homestead was located on the issues pertaining to 584 the previous homestead and on the amount of any assessment 585 reduction for which the taxpayer qualifies. The value adjustment 586 board in the county where the new homestead is located may not 587 hold its hearing until it has received the decision from the 588 value adjustment board in the county where the previous 589 homestead was located. 590 (e)âIn any circuit court proceeding to review the decision 591 of the value adjustment board in the county where the new 592 homestead is located, the court may also review the decision of 593 the value adjustment board in the county where the previous 594 homestead was located. 595 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 596 196.011, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 597 196.011âAnnual application required for exemption.â 598 (1) 599 (b)âThe form to apply for an exemption under s. 196.031, s. 600 196.078, s. 196.081, s. 196.091, s. 196.101, s. 196.102, s. 601 196.173, or s. 196.202 must include a space for the applicant to 602 list the social security number of the applicant and of the 603 applicantâs spouse, if any. If an applicant files a timely and 604 otherwise complete application, and omits the required social 605 security numbers, the application is incomplete. In that event, 606 the property appraiser shall contact the applicant, who may 607 refile a complete application by April 1. Failure to file a 608 complete application by that date constitutes a waiver of the 609 exemption privilege for that year, except as provided in 610 subsection (8) or subsection (9). 611 Section 4.âSection 196.078, Florida Statutes, is created to 612 read: 613 196.078âLong-term owner and permanent resident homestead 614 exemption.â 615 (1)âAny person who has held legal title or beneficial title 616 in equity to any real property in this state and who, in good 617 faith, has made such property his or her permanent residence for 618 30 years or more, who qualifies to receive a homestead exemption 619 provided in s. 196.031, and who has paid all ad valorem taxes 620 due on the property is entitled to an exemption equal to 50 621 percent of the assessed value of the property, which shall apply 622 to all ad valorem taxes other than school district levies. 623 (2)âFor purposes of this section, the applicable period of 624 ownership and residency must be satisfied as of January 1 of the 625 tax year for which the exemption is claimed. 626 (3)âPeriods of ownership and residency on multiple 627 homestead properties may be aggregated to meet the applicable 628 time periods specified in subsection (1). The property appraiser 629 shall keep the records necessary to verify eligibility for the 630 exemption under this section, including ownership and residency 631 periods, for any previous property for which a homestead 632 exemption was granted under s. 196.031(1). 633 Section 5.â(1)âThe Department of Revenue may, if all 634 conditions are deemed met, adopt emergency rules pursuant to s. 635 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, to administer this act. 636 (2)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, emergency 637 rules adopted pursuant to this section are effective for 6 638 months after adoption and may be renewed during the pendency of 639 procedures to adopt permanent rules addressing the subject of 640 the emergency rules. 641 Section 6.âThe amendments made by this act to ss. 193.155 642 and 196.011, Florida Statutes, and s. 196.078, Florida Statutes, 643 as created by this act, first apply to the 2027 tax roll. 644 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect on the effective date 645 of the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by SJR 274 646 or a similar joint resolution having substantially the same 647 specific intent and purpose, if such amendment to the State 648 Constitution is approved at the next general election or at an 649 earlier special election specifically authorized by law for that 650 purpose.